Wisconsin, session 2025, SB240.
do enact as follows:SB240,13Section 1. 106.145 of the statutes is created to read:SB240,2,31106.145 Workforce literacy grant program. (1) The department shall 2establish a program to provide an annual grant to an organization to support 3workforce literacy in this state.SB240,2,54(2) To be eligible for a grant under sub. (1), an organization shall meet all of 5the following requirements:SB240,2,66(a) Be a nonprofit entity.SB240,2,77(b) Be located in this state.SB240,2,98(c) Provide adult literacy services or support community-based literacy 9programs in over half of this state’s counties.SB240,2,1110(3) An organization that receives a grant under sub. (2) may use the grant for 11any of the following purposes:SB240,2,1212(a) Teaching workforce readiness skills.SB240,2,1513(b) Providing preparation for and administration of exams to receive general 14educational development certificates and declarations of equivalency of high school 15graduation.SB240,2,1616(c) Teaching digital literacy skills.SB240,2,1817(d) Teaching other literacy programs related to building and strengthening 18this state’s workforce.SB240,2,2119(e) Providing support services, training, programming, supplies, materials, or 20any other professional support to an organization that directly provides any of the 21services or programs described in pars. (a) to (d) to adult learners.SB240,2,2222